Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.321

School district public libraries abolished—Disposition of assets.

School district public libraries organized under chapter 119, Laws of 1935, as amended prior to *this 1965 amendatory act, are hereby abolished as of January 1, 1966.

All assets belonging to any school district public library abolished by this section shall go to the rural county library district of the county in which the school district public library is located.

[ 1965 c 122 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For codification of "this 1965 amendatory act" [1965 ex.s. c 122], see Codification Tables.